Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 8. Internet Dating Services

§ 2482a.
Definitions.

In this chapter:

“Account change” means a change to a member’s password, username, e-mail address, or other contact information an Internet dating service uses to enable communications between members.

“Banned member” means the member whose account or profile is the subject of a fraud ban.

“Fraud ban” means barring a member’s account or profile from an Internet dating service because, in the judgment of the service, the member poses a significant risk of attempting to obtain money from other members through fraudulent means.

“Internet dating service” means a person, or a division of a person, that is primarily in the business of providing dating services principally on or through the Internet.

“Member” means a person who submits to an Internet dating service information required to access the service and who obtains access to the service.

“Vermont member” means a member who provides a Vermont residential or billing address or zip code when registering with the Internet dating service.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § G.2, eff. May 24, 2016.

§ 2482b.
Requirements for Internet dating services.

An Internet dating service shall disclose to all of its Vermont members known to have previously received and responded to an on-site message from a banned member:

the user name, identification number, or other profile identifier of the banned member;

the fact that the banned member was banned because, in the judgment of the Internet dating service, the banned member may have been using a false identity or may pose a significant risk of attempting to obtain money from other members through fraudulent means;

that a member should never send money or personal financial information to another member; and

a hyperlink to online information that clearly and conspicuously addresses the subject of how to avoid being defrauded by another member of an Internet dating service.

The notification required by subsection (a) of this section shall be:

clear and conspicuous;

by e-mail, text message, or other appropriate means of communication; and

sent within 24 hours after the fraud ban, or at a later time if the service has determined, based on an analysis of effective messaging, that a different time is more effective, but in no event later than three days after the fraud ban.

An Internet dating service shall disclose in an e-mail, text message, or other appropriate means of communication, in a clear and conspicuous manner, within 24 hours after discovering an account change to a Vermont member’s account:

the fact that information on the member’s account has been changed;

a brief description of the change; and

if applicable, how the member may obtain further information on the change.

A banned member from Vermont who is identified to one or more Vermont members pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall have the right to challenge the ban by written complaint to the Office of the Vermont Attorney General.
(d) (1) A banned member from Vermont who is identified to one or more Vermont members pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall have the right to challenge the ban by written complaint to the Office of the Vermont Attorney General.

The Office of the Attorney General shall review a challenge brought by a banned member pursuant to this subsection and, if it finds that there was no reasonable basis for banning the member, shall require the Internet dating service to take reasonable corrective action to cure the erroneous ban.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § G.2, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 2482c.
Limited immunity.

An Internet dating service shall not be liable to any person, other than the State of Vermont, or any agency, department, or subdivision of the State, for disclosing to any member that it has banned a member, the user name or identifying information of the banned member, or the reasons for the Internet dating service’s decision to ban such member in accordance with section 2482b of this title.

An Internet dating service shall not be liable to any person, other than the State of Vermont, or any agency, department, or subdivision of the State, for the decisions regarding whether to ban a member, or how or when to notify a member pursuant to section 2482b of this title.

This subchapter does not diminish or adversely affect the protections for Internet dating services that are afforded in 47 U.S.C. § 230 (Federal Communications Decency Act).

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § G.2, eff. May 24, 2016.

§ 2482d.
Violations.

A person who violates this subchapter commits an unfair and deceptive act in trade and commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title.

The Attorney General has the same authority to make rules, conduct civil investigations, and enter into assurances of discontinuance as is provided under subchapter 1 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § G.2, eff. May 24, 2016.